tests/ky-verbs3pl.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] aorist forms":
    бол<v><iv><aor><coop><p3><pl> : болушат
    бол<v><iv><aor><p3><pl> : болушат
    бол<v><iv><aor><p3><pl> : болот
    бол<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : болот

  "[lexc] negative aorist forms":
    бол<v><iv><neg><aor><coop><p3><pl> : болушпайт
    бол<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><pl> : болушпайт
    бол<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><pl> : болбойт
    бол<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : болбойт

  "[lexc] ifi forms":
    бол<v><iv><ifi><coop><p3><pl> : болушту
    бол<v><iv><ifi><p3><pl> : болушту
    бол<v><iv><ifi><p3><pl> : болду
    бол<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : болду

  "[lexc] negative aorist forms":
    бол<v><iv><neg><ifi><coop><p3><pl> : болушкан жок
    бол<v><iv><neg><ifi><p3><pl> : болушкан жок
    бол<v><iv><neg><ifi><p3><pl> : болгон жок
    бол<v><iv><neg><ifi><p3><sg> : болгон жок
